Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1407
County comptroller; office; equipment.

In all counties having a county comptroller, the county board shall provide suitable office room, fireproof vaults of sufficient capacity, necessary books, blanks, stationery, clerks, and office furniture for the use of said county comptroller.

Laws 1907, c. 38, § 1, p. 174;

R.S.1913, § 1107;

C.S.1922, § 1041;

C.S.1929, § 26-735;

R.S.1943, § 23-1407.